Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Planning and Zoning Commission

Applied

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2003 WY 40, 65 P.3d 720,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statute requiring that zoning application be treated as approved if not acted on within specified period of time, 66 ALR4th 1012.

Validity and construction of zoning laws setting minimum requirements for floorspace or cubic footage inside residence, 87 ALR4th 294.

§ 18-5-201.
Authority vested in board of county commissioners; inapplicability of chapter to incorporated cities and towns; mineral resources; private schools.

To promote the public health, safety, morals and general welfare of the county, each board of county commissioners may regulate and restrict the location and use of buildings and structures and the use, condition of use or occupancy of lands for residence, recreation, agriculture, industry, commerce, public use and other purposes in the unincorporated area of the county. However, nothing in W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-208

shall be construed to contravene any zoning authority of any incorporated city or town. No zoning resolution or plan shall prevent any use or occupancy reasonably necessary to the extraction or production of the mineral resources in or under any lands subject thereto. No board of county commissioners shall require that a land use or physical development be consistent with a local land use plan unless the applicable provisions of the local land use plan have been incorporated into the local zoning regulations. Nothing in W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-208

shall be construed to allow any board of county commissioners, through the establishment of minimum lot size requirements or otherwise, to prevent residential or agricultural uses authorized for land divisions that are exempt from subdivision requirements pursuant to W.S. 18-5-303(a)(i). No zoning resolution or plan shall regulate and restrict the location and use of buildings and structures and the use, condition of use or occupancy of lands for the use of a private school as defined in W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iii) in any manner different from a public school, provided that the private school:

Is certified by the professional engineer or architect of record for the private school as being substantially similar to school facility commission guidelines for education buildings and siting and is designed to be constructed with appropriate materials, means and methods;

Has capacity for fifty (50) students or more; and

Is owned and operated by a not for profit entity.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 1; 1967, ch. 202, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2019 ch. 141, § 1, effective February 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 196, § 1, effective March 15, 2019; 2021 ch. 161, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “18-5-208” for “18-5-207.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 141, § 1, added the last sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 141, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 27, 2019.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 196, § 1, designated former undesignated paragraph as present introductory language in (a), substituted “city or town. No zoning” for “city or town and no zoning,” added the last sentence, and added (a)(i) through (a)(iii).

Laws 2019, ch. 196, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature March 15, 2019.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in (a).

Section not unconstitutional as improper delegation. —

This section is not unconstitutional because it does not grant authority to the county planning and zoning commission to adopt a comprehensive zoning plan, and thus, it is not an improper delegation. Carter v. Board of County Comm'rs, 518 P.2d 142,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1974).

Application of article. —

This article must be applied in such a way as to reasonably restrict the actions of boards of county commissioners. At the same time, however, to make the theories of planning meaningful, there must be a means to prevent changes in the conditions of a county pending the formulation of a comprehensive plan under § 18-5-202(b). The means necessary to maintain the status quo can be supplied by reference to the powers expressly and impliedly conferred by the County Zoning Act, taken in a light which is consistent with a reasonable exercise of police powers. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Legislature intended to differentiate this section from § 18-5-105. —

The statements of the respective purposes in this section and § 18-5-105 clearly indicate that the legislature intended to deal with separate subjects and provide authority to accomplish different objectives by the two pieces of legislation. Carter v. Board of County Comm'rs, 518 P.2d 142,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1974).

Sand, gravel, rock and limestone are not “minerals.” —

Sand, gravel, rock, and limestone are not minerals for purposes of §

18-5-201

.River Springs Ltd. Liability Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

County commissioners may foreclose extraction of sand, gravel,
rock and limestone. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-207

did not deny a county authority to regulate a landowner's
nonconforming gravel business by omitting “land” when
allowing regulation of changes to nonconforming uses because the
statute
said nothing about change in land use. Seherr-Thoss v. Teton County Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2014 WY 82, 329 P.3d 936,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2014).

Broad authority. —

The authority granted in this section gives counties broad power to regulate their lands, including broad authority to require compliance with zoning provisions in their efforts to promote orderly development of unincorporated areas. Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996).

County commissioners empowered to zone to control land in unincorporated areas. —

All of the boards of county commissioners throughout the state are given the power to adopt and enforce zoning resolutions for their own counties in order to restrict and control the use of lands located in unincorporated areas. Croxton v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 780,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1982).

County commissioners have authority to impose limitations on habitable space. —

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-201

, the Board of County Commissioners of Teton County, Wyoming had authority to promulgate Teton County, Wyo., Land Dev. Reg. § 2450, which limits the square footage of homes that can be built in the jurisdiction, because such land use regulation, with a purpose of preserving the area's beauty, past, microeconomics, and housing market, affect the welfare and character of the community. Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2003 WY 40, 65 P.3d 720,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2003).

County commissioners may foreclose extraction of sand, gravel, rock and limestone. —

There is no inhibition by this statute upon the authority of the board of county commissioners to limit land use by foreclosing the extraction of sand, gravel, rock, and limestone; the authority of the county to prohibit land use is not preempted but, if extraction is permitted by the board of county commissioners, the authority to regulate the mining process is assigned by statute to the Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ). River Springs Ltd. Liab. Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995).

A county can prohibit the extraction or processing of sand, gravel, rock, and limestone pursuant to its zoning authority, but a “grandfathered” use cannot be prohibited. River Springs Ltd. Liability Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

If the county permits the extraction, production, or processing of sand, gravel, rock, or limestone, or must do so because the use was a preexisting use, then regulation of those activities is accomplished under the EQA by the DEQ. If, however, the DEQ, pursuant to an exception in the statute, does not regulate those activities, they may be regulated by the county in a way that does not conflict with state regulation. River Springs Ltd. Liability Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 899 P.2d 1329,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

Board can adopt recommendations freezing building and land uses in unincorporated areas. —

The express power of the board of county commissioners under this section to regulate and restrict the use of buildings and land in unincorporated areas of the county is sufficient in and of itself, or, in the alternative, necessarily implies the authority to adopt recommendations which would freeze such building and land uses. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Board can enact freeze resolution without notice and hearing. —

In order to make meaningful such a power as that to adopt recommendations which would freeze building and land uses, the board of county commissioners necessarily must have the appurtenant power to enact a freeze resolution without notice and hearing. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Power of board is subject to restrictions. —

See Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Length of time. —

This section gives counties either express or implied power to enact a freeze resolution, without notice and hearing, providing that such a freeze is only for a reasonable length of time. Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Neighbors did not show a board of county commissioners erred in granting a Basic Use Permit to use property as a temporary construction storage/staging area, even though the property had been so used in the past and such a permit would likely be sought in the future, because the use was “temporary,” under the applicable land use regulation, as the permit duration was two years, and past or possible future uses of the property were irrelevant. Tayback v. Teton Cty. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2017 WY 114, 402 P.3d 984,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2017).

Property owner lacks vested right in contemplated development. —

Property owner has no vested right, which will withstand a later zoning regulation, in a development which is merely contemplated. Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

A subdivision developer who alleged that he had an entitlement or right to obtain approval of his subdivision, as originally proposed and without restrictions from a board of county commissioners, failed to identify a clearly established statutory or constitutional right that had been violated. Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Revocation of zoning variance for racetrack upheld

where the evidence reasonably supporting a county's conclusion that permitting a race track on a predominantly agricultural location did not promote the public health, safety and general welfare and would have been injurious to the neighborhood. Sheridan Race Car Ass'n v. Rice Ranch, 864 P.2d 30,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Teton County Youth Servs., Inc., 652 P.2d 400,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1982); Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(2004).

Cited

in

Quinn Revocable Trust v. SRW, Inc., 2004 WY 65, 91 P.3d 146,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Implementation of Land Use Policy: Police Power vs. Eminent Domain,” III Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1968).

See comment, “County and Municipal Flood Plain Zoning Under Existing Wyoming Legislation,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1972).

As to the development of land use planning in Wyoming, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

For casenote, “Mining Law — Gravel Extraction — Is Control Over Small Gravel Mining the Best Road for Regulation?
River Springs Limited Liability Company v. Board of County Commissioners of County of Teton,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1995),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of zoning ordinances prohibiting or regulating outside storage of house trailers, motor homes, campers, vans and the like, in residential neighborhoods, 95 ALR3d 378.

Library References.

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§
174.03, 174.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 18-5-202.
Planning and zoning commission; composition; residency requirements, terms and removal of members; vacancies; rules; record; meetings to be public; secretary; preparation and amendments; purpose; certifications and hearing; amendments.

Each board of county commissioners may by resolution create and establish a planning and zoning commission. The commission shall be composed of five (5) members appointed by the board at least three (3) of whom shall reside in the unincorporated area of the county, provided that this provision shall not affect the membership composition of any existing commission. The terms of the members appointed to the first planning and zoning commission shall be of such length and so arranged that the terms of one (1) member will expire each year, and thereafter each member shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Any member of the commission may be removed for cause other than politics or religion and after public hearing by the board of county commissioners. If a vacancy occurs in the commission the board of county commissioners shall fill the vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term. The planning and zoning commission shall organize within thirty (30) days after its establishment, shall adopt rules for the transaction of its business and keep a record of its actions and determinations. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. All meetings, records and accounts of the commission shall be public. The board of county commissioners shall designate the county clerk, another county employee or a member of the planning and zoning commission to serve as secretary to the commission. The secretary shall keep the record of commission actions in accordance with statute.

The planning and zoning commission may prepare and amend a comprehensive plan including zoning for promoting the public health, safety, morals and general welfare of the unincorporated areas of the county, and certify the plan to the board of county commissioners. Before certifying its plan or amendments thereto to the board the commission shall hold at least one (1) public hearing. Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least thirty (30) days before the date of the hearing. Any person may petition the planning and zoning commission to amend any zoning plan adopted under the provisions of W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-208

.

The planning and zoning commission shall prepare recommendations to effectuate the planning and zoning purposes and certify its recommendations to the board of county commissioners. Before adopting the recommendations the board shall hold at least one (1) public hearing. Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be given by one (1) publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least fourteen (14) days before the date of the hearing. After public hearing has been held, the board shall vote upon the adoption of the planning or zoning recommendation. No planning or zoning recommendation shall be adopted unless a majority of the board votes in favor thereof.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, §§ 2 to 4; 1967, ch. 202, §§ 2 to 4; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1985, ch. 179, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1; ch 82 § 1.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 34, § 1, in (a), substituted the last two sentences for the former last sentence, which read: “The county clerk shall serve as secretary to the commission.”

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch 82, § 1, substituted “18-5-208” for “18-5-207” in (b).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Application of article. —

This article must be applied in such a way as to reasonably restrict the actions of boards of county commissioners. At the same time, however, to make the theories of planning meaningful, there must be a means to prevent changes in the conditions of a county pending the formulation of a comprehensive plan under subsection (b) of this section. The means necessary to maintain the status quo can be supplied by reference to the powers expressly and impliedly conferred by this article, taken in a light which is consistent with a reasonable exercise of police powers. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Resolution procedures. —

Before the county commissioners can adopt a resolution, the planning and zoning commission must recommend adoption of the resolution to the county board. Crouthamel v. Board of Albany County Comm'rs, 951 P.2d 835,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1998).

Procedures of board. —

Tie vote of board of county commissioners on planning recommendations is a rejection that the board can reconsider during the same session unless statute or the board's own regulations say otherwise. Hirschfield v. Board of County Comm'rs, 944 P.2d 1139,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1997).

The rule of strict construction must be adopted

in determining whether the powers delegated to the zoning commission have been acceptably exercised. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Section

18-5-204

concerns only resolutions adopted under subsection (c) of this section.

Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

No other provisions contemplating adoption of emergency planfor unincorporated areas. —

There are no other provisions in this article which contemplate the adoption of any other type of zoning scheme than comprehensive. Specifically, there are no separate provisions which contemplate the adoption of an interim or emergency plan for the unincorporated areas of the counties. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Board can adopt recommendations freezing building and landuses in unincorporated areas. —

The express power of the board of county commissioners under §

18-5-201

to regulate and restrict the use of buildings and land in unincorporated areas of the county is sufficient in and of itself, or, in the alternative, necessarily implies the authority to adopt recommendations which would freeze such building and land uses. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Board can enact freeze resolution without notice and hearing.—

In order to make meaningful such a power as that to adopt recommendations which would freeze building and land uses, the board necessarily must have the appurtenant power to enact a freeze resolution without notice and hearing. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Freeze resolution may not be extended without notice and hearing.—

The exercise of the power to enact a freeze resolution without notice and hearing is subject to certain restrictions. Such a resolution may not be extended, as a matter of course, so that it essentially becomes a board's comprehensive plan, without notice and hearing. The restrictions which would bar such a result can be found in the plain language of subsection (c) of this section. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Freeze resolutions. —

Where county failed to follow the statutory requirements in adopting a freeze resolution, the ten month moratorium was void ab initio when the initial recommendation to the County Board came from the planning staff and not the planning and zoning commission. Crouthamel v. Board of Albany County Comm'rs, 951 P.2d 835,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1998).

Notice and hearing are mandated by section. —

This section mandates a notice and public hearing as conditions precedent to the adoption of any recommendations of the zoning commission, and no action on such recommendations by the board is authorized until the notice and hearing have been effected. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Notice and hearing. —

The ten month moratorium on commercial use of property within the county was an invalid exercise of the county's police power, where the County Board did not provide notice and hearing as required under this section and described in Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).Crouthamel v. Board of Albany County Comm'rs, 951 P.2d 835,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1998).

Notice requirements sufficient. —

Landowners' right to procedural due process was not violated by the adoption of a land use management plan because the notice required by this section was given; a published notice that identifies the particular issues discussed, even in general terms, is sufficient. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

Length of time for which freeze resolution may initially continue.—

Under the supreme court's construction of subsection (c) of this section, a freeze resolution may initially continue only for a length of time which affords an opportunity to give notice and hold a hearing on the issue of whether or not such a resolution should be given more permanent status under that subsection. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

The board must be diligent in formulating a comprehensive plan, when there is an interim freeze resolution in effect,

in order to minimize the possible deprivation of property rights. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

No authority exists in this article which permits county commissioners to freeze the land use of an entire county for 5 years

under the guise that some kind of a continuing emergency exists — all without compliance with the notice and hearing provisions of the law. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Although the county commissioners' “emergency” resolution of August 24, 1971, freezing existing land use in Park County without previously publishing a notice and holding a public meeting as provided by law, was initially a valid exercise of its implied power to do those things which would make its express power to regulate and restrict the use of buildings and land in unincorporated areas of the county meaningful, this temporary land freeze became, by extension, by resolution, a permanent land plan, which, under the statutes of this state, cannot be implemented without complying with the provisions with respect to public notice and hearing. As a result, the various subsequent resolutions, passed without compliance with the statutes and which extended for some 5 years the original land freeze, were invalid. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Authorized continuum for freeze resolutions. —

This article authorizes the following continuum: (1) On recommendation of the county zoning commission, the board can adopt a freeze resolution in appropriate circumstances without prior notice and hearing; (2) pursuant to subsection (c) of this article, notice of such action shall be promptly given in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, which also shall notice a hearing to be held on the 30th day after the publication on the question of whether or not the freeze resolution should be extended pending the formulation of a comprehensive plan; and (3) within a reasonable time, if the freeze resolution is so extended, the board shall adopt a comprehensive plan under subsection (b) of this section. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Change in density requires notice and comment. —

The court properly concluded that a zoning board failed to abide by the statutory procedures of notice and comment prior to adopting a change in density for contested acreage. Hoke v. Moyer, 865 P.2d 624,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1993).

Stated

in

Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of statutory notice requirements prerequisite to adoption or amendment of zoning ordinance or regulation, 96 ALR2d 449.

Disqualification for bias or interest of administrative officer sitting in zoning proceeding, 10 ALR3d 694.

Right to cross-examination of witnesses in hearings before administrative zoning authorities, 27 ALR3d 1304.

Construction and application of statute or ordinance requiring notice as prerequisite to granting variance or exception to zoning requirement, 38 ALR3d 167.

Construction and application of zoning regulations in connection with funeral homes, 92 ALR3d 328.

Validity of zoning ordinances prohibiting or regulating outside storage of house trailers, motor homes, campers, vans and the like, in residential neighborhoods, 95 ALR3d 378.

§ 18-5-203.
Certificate required to locate buildings or use land within zoning resolution; issuance and denial; appeal upon denial.

It is unlawful to locate, erect, construct, reconstruct, enlarge, change, maintain or use any building or use any land within any area included in a zoning resolution without first obtaining a zoning certificate from the board of county commissioners or its designee and no zoning certificate shall be issued unless the plans for the proposed building, structure or use fully comply with the zoning regulations then in effect. The board of county commissioners or its designee shall act promptly upon any application filed with it and shall grant certificates when the proposed construction or use complies with the requirements of the zoning resolution. If it denies the application, the board or its designee shall specify the reasons for the denial. Any applicant desiring to appeal shall appeal to the board of county commissioners. The decision of the board of county commissioners may be reviewed by the district court and by the supreme court upon appeal in the same manner as provided in W.S.

15-1-609

, for review of decisions of boards of adjustment.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 5; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2017 ch. 57, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

15-1-609

” for “W.S. 15-626.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “or its designee” preceding “and no zoning”; inserted “or its designee” preceding “shall act promptly”; inserted “or its designee” preceding shall specify the”; inserted “Any applicant desiring to appeal shall appeal to the board of county commissioners”; and made a stylistic change

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Unlawful issuance of certificate where project failed to meetamended regulations. —

Board unlawfully issued planning certificate where a project did not meet amended zoning regulations, even though the project had received initial approval based on ordinances then in effect. Snake River Venture v. Board of County Comm'rs, 616 P.2d 744,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1980).

Injunction improperly granted. —

Where the county had not adopted a valid zoning resolution, the ten month moratorium on commercial use of property was void ab initio, and the preliminary injunctions which kept landowner from operating a commercial business should not have been granted. Crouthamel v. Board of Albany County Comm'rs, 951 P.2d 835,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1998).

“Open” districts are, in effect, outside any zoning restrictions.

Croxton v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 780,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1982).

Property owner generally without vested right in contemplateddevelopment. —

A property owner generally has no vested right (which will withstand a later zoning regulation) in a development which is merely contemplated. That is not to say a zoning regulation or resolution should not be examined itself to determine whether it has altered the general rules and provided property owners with additional rights. Croxton v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 780,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1982).

Review of denial of zoning certificate or development permit.—

The decision of a board of county commissioners, in denying the issuance of a development permit, which may be equated with a zoning certificate under this section, is adjudicative in nature and is, therefore, subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

) and reviewable under Rule 12, W.R.A.P., pursuant to §

16-3-114

.Board of County Comm'rs v. Teton County Youth Servs., 652 P.2d 400,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1982).

Revocation of second zoning variance for racetrack upheld

where the evidence reasonably supporting a county's conclusion that permitting a race track on a predominantly agricultural location would not promote the public health, safety and general welfare and would have been injurious to the neighborhood. Sheridan Race Car Ass'n v. Rice Ranch, 864 P.2d 30,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1993).

Changes during pendency of appeal. —

Where the zoning scheme was changed to industrial during the pendency of the appeal, determining the validity of the old agricultural zoning certificates would have no practical effect on the existing controversy and the case was dismissed on mootness. Bard Ranch Co. v. Frederick, 950 P.2d 564,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Ford v. Board of County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 91,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1996); Pedro/Aspen, Ltd. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2004 WY 84, 94 P.3d 412,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of zoning regulations in connection with funeral homes, 92 ALR3d 328.

Standing of civic or property owners' association to challenge zoning board decision (as aggrieved party), 8 ALR4th 1087.

Standing of zoning board of appeals or similar body to appeal reversal of its decision, 13 ALR4th 1130.

§ 18-5-204.
Violation of W.S. 18-5-202(c); continuing violation.

No person shall locate, erect, construct, reconstruct, enlarge, change, maintain or use any building or use any land in violation of a resolution or amendment adopted by any board of county commissioners under W.S. 18-5-202(c). Each day’s continuation of such violation is a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 6; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

This section concerns only resolutions adopted under § 18-5-202(c).

Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

No authority exists in this article which permits county commissioners to freeze land use of entire county for 5 years

under the guise that some kind of a continuing emergency exists — all without compliance with the notice and hearing provisions of the law. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Although the county commissioners' “emergency” resolution of August 24, 1971, freezing existing land use in Park County without previously publishing a notice and holding a public meeting as provided by law, was initially a valid exercise of its implied power to do those things which would make its express power to regulate and restrict the use of buildings and land in unincorporated areas of the county meaningful, this temporary land freeze became, by extension, by resolution, a permanent land plan, which, under the statutes of this state, cannot be implemented without complying with the provisions with respect to public notice and hearing. As a result, the various subsequent resolutions, passed without compliance with the statutes and which extended for some 5 years the original land freeze, were invalid. Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977).

Fines accrued daily for land use violations. —

Where the maximum square footage allowed by the Teton County, Wyoming, Land Development Regulations was 8,000 square feet of habitable space, the homeowners were required to pay fines for enlarging their home to 11,000 square feet. Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

18-5-204

,

18-5-206

, the homeowners were required to pay a fine for each day they were in violation of the habitable space regulation; the total fine to be paid by the homeowners was $ 714,000.00.
Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2007 WY 177, 170 P.3d 117,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs of Teton County v. Crow, 2006 WY 45, 131 P.3d 988,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. Apr. 13, 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enforcement of zoning regulation as affected by other violations, 4 ALR4th 462.

§ 18-5-205.
Enforcement of zoning resolution by injunction, mandamus or abatement; appeal.

Any zoning resolution passed by the board pursuant to W.S. 18-5-202(b) and (c) is enforceable in addition to other remedies provided by law by injunction, mandamus or abatement.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 7; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

District court has jurisdiction to enforce zoning decision by injunction.

Wardwell Dev. Corp. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 639 P.2d 888,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 286

(Wyo. 1982).

Abatement. —

In a case in which a county sought an abatement order under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-5-205

after a property owner altered and enlarged his home in violation of the county's land development regulations, the county was not required to make a showing of irreparable injury in order for the district court to order abatement. The owner's violation of the regulations constituted a basis for the imposition of an abatement order. Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2006 WY 45, 131 P.3d 988,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2006).

Applied

in

Croxton v. Board of County Comm'rs, 644 P.2d 780,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Nickle v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2007 WY 115, 162 P.3d 1208,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(July 24, 2007).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Remedies to compel municipal officials to enforce zoning regulations, 35 ALR2d 1135.

Mandamus to compel zoning officials to cancel permit granted in violation of zoning regulation, 68 ALR3d 166.

§ 18-5-206.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 18-5-201 through 18-5-204.

Whoever violates any provision of W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-204

shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each offense.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 85, § 8; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1997, ch. 188, § 1.

Imposition of fine for each day's violation. —

District court imposed a fine on a property owner for 242 days in connection with the owner's violation of a county's habitable space regulation, even though it was evident that the owner's violation of the regulation continued for a considerably longer time than 242 days. The district court was required to impose a fine for each day the owner's violation continued, and the record did not reflect a stipulation by the county that the fine should be imposed for a lesser period of time. Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2006 WY 45, 131 P.3d 988,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2006).

Fines accrued daily for land use violations. —

Where the maximum square footage allowed by the Teton County, Wyoming, Land Development Regulations was 8,000 square feet of habitable space, the homeowners were required to pay fines for enlarging their home to 11,000 square feet. Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

18-5-204

,

18-5-206

, the homeowners were required to pay a fine for each day they were in violation of the habitable space regulation; the total fine to be paid by the homeowners was $ 714,000.00.
Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2007 WY 177, 170 P.3d 117,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited

in

Nickle v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2007 WY 115, 162 P.3d 1208,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(July 24, 2007).